Wyoming, session 2025, HB0250.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 8-1-102(a)(vi) and 8-1-103 by
creating a new subsection (b) are amended to read:

8-1-102. Definitions.

HB0250

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0675
(a) As used in the statutes unless the legislature
clearly specifies a different meaning or interpretation or
the context clearly requires a different meaning:

(vi) "Person" includes an individual,
partnership, corporation, joint stock company or any other
association or entity, public or private. When applicable
to an individual, the interpretation and construction
specified in W.S. 8-1-103(b) shall apply to this
definition;

8-1-103. Rules of construction for statutes.

(b) For purposes of interpretation and construction
under the Wyoming constitution and all statutes of this
state, the following shall apply:

(i) All individual persons are living human
beings entitled to protection of their health. This right
is a fundamental right entitled to full protection under
the Wyoming constitution;

HB0250

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0675
(ii) When applicable to an individual person,
"person" is someone who possesses at least one (1) of the
following:

(A) Heart function;

(B) Respiratory system function;

(C) Central nervous system function;

(D) Brain function;

(E) Skeletal development or function;

(F) Joint or muscle appendage development;

(G) Organ function.

(iii) No parent, guardian or legal
representative of any other person shall make health care
decisions causing harm to the functions specified in
paragraph (ii) of this subsection except as necessary when
medically documented and as a necessity to save the life of
HB0250

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0675
a pregnant woman and except for the discontinuation of
medical treatment or care that keeps a person alive where a
doctor has documented that there is no chance of a
meaningful recovery. All exception determinations under
this paragraph shall be evaluated by the Wyoming board of
medicine;

(iv) The definitions and rules of construction
specified in this subsection shall not apply to the Wyoming
Health Care Decisions Act.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0250